cs_CZ/hyph_cs_CZ.dic
pшe3j
pшe3t4
pшe3z
pшe3и2
pшi3
pшih4
2p№
p№4ti
2p»
qu2
2r.
1ra.
ra4br
ra4em
ra4es
ra4ff
ra4hl
ra4hm
ra4jg
ra4j№
2rak
ra4nh
ra3si
rast4r
ra4vv
ra4wl
ra4y.
ra4yo
ra4пm
4raѕi
r1b
r2bl
r1c
rca3
r3cha
r3cho
rc4ki
r1d
r4dla
rdo2s
re4ad
re4au
red4r
re4et
re3kl
re3kvi
re4mr
re2sb
res3l
retis4
ret4r
re4um
r1ha
r3hl.
rh3n
r1ho
r3hu
r1hб
ri4bb
1ric
ric4ku
ri4dg
ri4dr
ri4fl
ri4gh
ri4zm
2rk
r2kl
r1l
2r1m
r4mio
2rn
rna4v№
rn4dr
ro4ad
ro3by
rod2l
ro3d4r
3rofy
ro3h
ro4h.
ro4jb
ro4k№
rom3n
romy4s
ropбt4
ro2sb
ro4skv
ro4sky
ro3sv
ro3ti
ro3tl
ro4tи
ro3vd
rovм4t
3rovэ
roz3d
roz3n
ro4zo
roz3v
ro3zб
ro4иp
rpa3d
2rr
rr4ha
rr4ho
2r1s
r2st
r4stu
rs3tvм
rs3tvэ
2r1t
r2th
r4trб
rt4sm
rtu3
r2t3v
rt4zu
1ru.
ru3se
ru3si
rus3k
ru3ѕi
3rvanн
r1x
1ry.
rych3
ryd2
rys3ky
rys3t
ry4zk
ry4zn
ry4н.
ry4№k
2rz
rz3d
rz3l
rбd4l
rб4dѕ
1rбk
rб3ri
1rбш
r1и
4rиitэ.
rи3t
3rй.
2rу
2r№
r№4nн
rщ4m.
rщs3ta
rщ4v.
3rэ.
rэ4zn
2s.
sa4pf
sa4pr
sas3k
s2b2
s2c
s3ca
s3ce.
sch2
sch4l
sch4n
3schop
s3ci
sci4e
s3cн
s2d
1se
se4au
se3h
se4ig
se4il
sej4m
se4ku
3sel
se3lh
3sem
ser4va
se3s2
ses4k
se4ss
se4stra
se4stru
se4stш
set2
se3tk
se3tш
se4ur
se3z
se3иt
2sf
s3fo
3sfй
s3fъ
1si
3sic
3sif
si4fl
sig4no
3sik
si3ste
3sit
s2j
s3ju
s2k
4skac
s4kak
4skam
s4kok
2skon
skos4
4skot
sk4ra
sk4ru
sk4ry
4skve
sk4vo
s3kбn
s3kщ
3sl.
4s3la.
s4lav
s3le.
s4led
s3lem
s3len
s3let
s4lib
s4liиi
3sln
4s3lo.
s2ly
s3ly.
s1lн
s2ma
s4mek
s2mo
2sn
s2na
s3nat
s2ne
s3ne.
sn4tl
s2nб
s3nб.
s4nнd
1so
sob4l
so3br
so4sk
so4tv
sou3h
sou3s
souz4
so4№k
s2p
s4pol
spro4s
1sr
2ss
ss4sr
2st.
4sta.
s3taj
s2tan
st4at
4stec
s4tep
st4er
s4tero
s4tich
2stil
s4tink
4stit.
4stiи
st3lo
2stn
4sto.
s4tona
4stou.
4str.
4stram
s4trik
4strn
4strбc
4stupni
s2tv
st4ve
3stvн
4sty.
s4tyl
3sty№
s2tб
4stб.
s3tбш
4stм.
s4tмd
3stмh
s2tмr
s2tмѕ
s1tн
2stн.
s3tшej
1su
su4ba
su4bo
suma4
su3ve
s2v
sy3c
sych3r
sy4nes
sб2d
3sбh
sб2kl
2s2и
s3иi
1sй
1sн
2sт
2s»
s3»o
1sщ
s2ѕ
2t.
1ta.
ta2bl
tac4tvo
t2a3d
1taj
ta4jf
ta4jg
4talt
4tand
3tanм
t1ao
2tark
tast4
ta3str
ta4иk
2t1b
2t1c
1te
3te.
te4ak
te4fl
te4in
4tenйm
teob4
tep3l
ters4
tes3ta
te4tr
te4uc
te4ur
te4ut
2tf
2tg
1ti
ti4gr
2tih
ti3kl
tin4g
ti4pl
ti3sl
tis4tr
ti4tr
2titu
tiz4r
4tizн
tiъ3
2tiѕ
2tk2
t4kal
4t2kan
t4kat
t2kl
tk4la
tk4li
4tknм
t2kб
2tl
3tl.
4tla.
t1le
tles3
3tlm
t3lo.
t4lou
tlu3
tlu4s
t1ly
t1lй
2tm
t2ma
2tn
t3nн
1to
to4as
to3b
tob4l
to3dr
to4hm
to4ir
2toj
tol4s
to4ol
4top.
4topt
4topu
2torn
2toup
2tp
t3rant
t4rea
t4ref
tre4t
4tric.
trip4
t4rit
t4rog
t3rol
tro4sk
t4rou
4trouh
4troт.
4trun
t4rus
4t4ruѕ
t3rбln
4trб№
2trи
t3rщm
t3rщv
2trэ
2t1s
ts4ko
ts2t
2t1t
tt4ch
tt4ri
1tu.
tu4ff
1tuj
tu4lk
2tup
tu4r.
tu3ry
tu4s.
tu4».
tu3ѕi
t2v
2tve
2t3vi
t4vinn
t4vi№
t4vэc
1ty.
ty4gш
ty2la
ty4шe
ty4шh
ty4шj
ty4шo
ty4шr
ty4шъ
3tб.
tб4fl
t2и
t3иi
2tин
1tй
tй2bl
3tйm
1tм
tм3d4l
2tмh
2tмnn
2tмp
1tнc
4tнc.
4tнce
1tнm
2tнn
2tнr
2tш
t4шeb
tшeh3n
t2шel
t2шic
t3шil
tш4ti
t1шu
t2шб
3tшбb
tшн4s
2t№
t3№t
t№4ti
1tщ
1tэ.
1tэm
1tэш
3tэ№
u1
2u.
u2at
u2b
u3ba
u3be
u3bi
u3bo
ubs4t
u3bu
u3bб
u3bн.
u3bщ
uc4tн
2u2d
u3de
u3di
u3do
u3dru
u3du
u3dy
u3dн
ue4fa
2uf
u2hl
uh3lб
uh3no
u2in
u2jm
u2k
u3ka.
uk4aj
uk4al
uk4at
u3ke
uk3la
uk3le
u3ko
u3ku
u3ky
uk4б.
u3kщ
ul4fa
ul1h
ul4pн
u2m
u3ma
u3me
u3mi
um4pl
um4ru
u3mu
u3mб
3umш
u2n
un4dl
u3ne
u3no
u3nu
u3nм
u3nн
u3nщ
un4ѕr
u2p
u3pa
u3pe
upe2r3
u3pi
u3pln
u3pu
u3py
u3pб
u3pм
u3pн
u3pщ
u2r
u3ra
u3re
u3ri
2u3ro
u3ru
u3ry.
u3rб
1urи
u3rщ
u2s
us3ky
us3kб
us3kй
us3kэ
us1l
us2lo
u3so
u4ste
u4sty
u4stй
u4stм
u3stш
u4st№
u4stэ
u3su.
u3sy
u3sб
u3sн
u3sщ
u4tro
u4trб
u2v
u3vi
u3vu
u2z
u3ze
u3zi
uz1l
u3zo
u3zu
u3zн
u2и
u3иa
u3иe
u3иi
u3иo
uи3t
u3иu
u3иб
u3ин
u2п
u2т
u2№
u3№e
u3№i
u№4kl
u3№o
u№3tн
u3№u
u3№б
u3№н
u2ѕ
u3ѕe
u3ѕo
u3ѕu
u3ѕб
u3ѕн
1v
2v.
va3dl
va4j»
va4kl
2v1b
2v1c
v2ch
2v2d
v4dal
v3di
v4dмk
v4dми
ve3dle
ve3jd
3ven
ve2p
ve3ps
vep3ш
ves3l
ve4sm
ves4p
ve3sta
ve3t4ш
ve2z3m
vi4ch
vide2
vi4dr
vi4et
vi4kr
vi2tr
2vk
v2kr
v2l
2v3la.
4vle.
4vlem
2vlo
2vm
2vn
v4nad
vo3b
vo4ic
vo4ja
vo4jb
vo4jd
vo4jj
vo4jm
vo4jш
vo2s
vo4tш
vou3
vous2
v2p
vr2c
vr2dl
4vrny
v1ro
vr4st
vrst3v
vrs4tvм
2vs2
v1sk
v3stv
2v2t
vy3c
vy3d2
vy4dra
vyp2
vy3s2
vy4sn
vys4t
vy3t
vy3и
vyи4k
vy№2
vy4№.
vy4№m
vy4№№
vy4ѕl
v2z2
vz4no
vz4nй
vz4nм
vz4nн
vб3ri
2v2и
v3иб
v3ин
v4инr
vм4cm
vм3t4a
vнce3
vн4hat
3vнn
2vт
2vшн
v3шнn
v2№2
v№e3s
v3№tн.
3vэs
vэ3t
3vэ3z
v2ѕ2
wa4fd
3war
wa4re
we2
2x.
xand4
2xf
xisk4
2xn
3xov
x1t
xt4ra
xy4sm
y1
y2a
y2bl
yb3ri
y2ch
y4chr
y2d1l
yd4lб
y2dr
yd4y.
y2e
y2gr
y3hn
yh4ne
yj4ma
yj4me
y2kl
yk3la
y3klop
yk4ly
ymanй4
ym4kl
yna4s
y3ni
ype4r
yp4si
yp4tб
y2pш
yr2v
y2s
y3sa
y3se
y3si
ys3lu
y3sm
y3so
y3sp
ys2t
ys3te
yst4r
y3su
y3sv
y3sy
y3sб
y3sй
y3sн
yt4me
yu3ѕ
y3vs
yvм4t
y3zb
y3zd
y3zk
y3zn
yz4nм
yz4nн
y3zp
yz4po
yи2k
y2т
yш3b
yшk4n
yш4иe
y3шн
y2№
y3№e
y3№i
y3№k
y№1l
y3№o
y3№p
y3№u
y3№н
yѕ2
y3ѕd
1z
2z.
zab2l
za4bs
za4dk
za3dl
za4dn
za3h
za3i
za3j
za4jk
za3k
za4kt
zal4k
zam4n
za3p2
za3s2
zat2
za3tl
zat4r
za4ut
za3z
zaz4n
za4z№
za4и.
za3№
za№4k
za4№s
2zb
zban4
z2by
zbys4
2z1c
2z2d
z3di
zdnм4nн
z4doba
z4dobnэ
zd4re
zd4vн
z2e
ze3h
ze3p2
4zerot
ze3s2
zes4p
zet2
zev2
ze3vn
ze3z
ze4z.
2z2f
z1hб
z4ine
z2j
z3jн
2z2k
z3ka.
z3ky
z3kй
z3kщ
z3kэ
2zl
3zl.
zlhos4
zlik3
z3ly.
z2m2
2zme
z3mn
z3my
z4mмn
2z2n
3znak
z4nal
z3ne.
z3nic
z3no
z3nu
z3ny
z3nй
z3nм
z4nмl
z3nн
z4nнt
z4nнv
z3nэ
zo4tr
zo4№k
2z2p
z3pt
z4pбt
3zrak
2z1s2
2zt
ztros3
z4trб
z3tш
3zu.
zu3mo
zu3mм
zu3mн
zu3№
z2v
zva4d
z3vaш
z3vi
zvik4
zv4nм
z3vod
z3voj
z4von
zv4ro
z4vбn
z4vмs
z3vнj
3zy.
2zz
zб1
zбh2
zб4kl.
3zбp
zб3s2
zб3z
zб№2
2zи
z3иl
2zт
z2ш
zшej3
z3шez
z3шe№
2z№2
z3№k
z№4ka
z3№t
2z2ъ1
zъ3и
zъ3ѕ
zщ3s
б1b
б2bl
бb4ry
б4bш.
б3cho
бc3ti3
б1d
б2dl
бdo4s
бdos4ti
бd1ш
б1ha
б3he
бh1l
б3hl.
бh3n
б1ho
б1hr
б1hб
б1j
б4jmu
бj4mщ
б4kli
бk4ni
б1la
б1le
б1lo
б1lu
б1ly
б3lй
б1lн
б3my
б3mй
б1mм
б3mн
б3mэ
бne4v
б1ra
б1re
бr2m
б1ro
б1ru
б3rщ
б1s
б2sc
б2s3k
бs4k.
бs4kl
бs4kn
б2sla
бs4ly
б2sm
бs4po
б2st
бt3k
бt1r
б1tu
б1ty
б1tн
б3tэ
бv4si
бv4sн
бz3k
бz3ni
бzni4c
бz4vi
б2т
б1ш
бш4ke
бш4kщ
б2№
б3№e
б3№н
2и.
1иa
иa4br
2иb
2и1c
1иe
3иe.
иe1c
иes3k
1иi
2иk
и3ka.
и3ko
и3ku
и3ky
2и1m
2иn
и2ne
1иo
и2p
2иs
и1sk
иs4la
иs4sr
2и2t
и4tenй.
и4tenэ
иt4la
и4tovэ.
3иtv
4иtмn
и3tн
1иu
1иб
1ин
инs3l
1ищ
2п.
1пa
1пo
пs4te
2п1t
3пuj
й1
й2d
й3di
й3do
й2f
й3fo
йf1r
й2kl
й2l
й2m
й3ma
й3me
й3mi
й3mo
й3mu
й3mщ
4йre.
й2s
й2t
й3ta
й3to
й3tб
й2№
й2ѕ
м1c
мd3r
м3ha
м3he
м3hl.
мh3lo
мh3n
м1ho
м3hu
м3hщ
м3ja
м1je
м1jo
м3jщ
м4klй
м3k2t
м1l
м1ra
мra3d
м1re
м1ro
мr3s
мrs4t
м1ru
м1ry
м1rщ
мs3k
мs3n
мt1a3
мt4ac
мt1l
м1tr
мt3ra
м4traj
мt3v
м1tн
мt3шн
м2v
м3va
м3ve
м3vl
м3vo
м3vu
м3vб
мv3и
м2z
м3ze
м3zi
мz3n
м3zo
м3zн
м1ш
м2№
м3№e
м3№i
м3№o
м3№u
м3№б
м3№н
м№3»
м№4»s
м2»
м3»o
м2ѕ
м3ѕe
м3ѕi
м3ѕo
м3ѕu
м3ѕн
н1b
нb3ш
н3cho
нch4t
нd1l
н1h
н2hl
нh3n
н1j
нjed4
нj4mщ
н2kr
н1l
н1mб
н3mй
н1mм
н1r
н1sa
н2s3k
нs4kl
нs4kn
нs4l.
нs3le
нs4ln
нsбh2
н1t
нt3k
н3t3шe
нz3da
нz3de
нz3k
н3zna
н3z3ni
н3znмn
н2т
н1ш
н2№
н3№e
н3№i
н3№o
н3№н
1т
2т.
2тa
тa3d
2тk
2тm
3тov
т1s
2т1t
у1
у2z
у3za
у3zi
у3zo
у3zy
2ш.
шa4pl
шa4пm
2ш2b
2шc
2шd
шe3ch
шe4dob
шe1h
шe3jd
шe3kl
шe3kv
шe4kшн
шeo4r
шe3p2
шe4p.
шe4pk
шe4pи
шer4v
2шes
шe3ska
шe3sko
шe2sp
шes3po
шe4sr
шe3sta
шe3stu
шe3stб
шe3stш
шe3tl
шet4ш
шe3zd
шe3zk
4шezl
шe3иt
шi1
шia3
шi3h
шi4h.
шi4hn
шi4jп
шi4l.
шi4lb
шil2n
4шine
шis2
3шi4t.
шi4v.
шi4vk
шi4vn
шi3z
шiи4t
шi3ш
шi4№.
2шk
ш2kl
шk4la
шk4li
шk4ly
шk4no
2ш1l
2ш1m
2шn
1шo
2шou
2ш2p
2ш1s
шs4to
2ш1t
ш2v
2шz
шб4pl
шб2sl
2ш1и
2шнd
шн4kш
шн1s
2ш№
ш3№t
ш№4ti
1№
2№.
№ab3
№a4vl
2№1c
№ej4d
№ep3t
№i4mr
2№2k
№3ka
№3ke
№3k3li
4№3kou
4№kov
3№kr
№k4ro
№3ku.
№3ky
2№l
№2la
№2li
№3liv
№2lo
№lб2
№2lй
№2lэ
2№1m
№mi4d
2№n
№2p
2№1s
2№t
№4tip
№t4ka
№t4kl
№4tмk
№2tмs
№4tмv
№4tнp
№2v
№н3d
№2т
№3№н
2№2»
№3»o
№3»u
№3»б
1»
2».
3»al
2»k
2»m
2»t
»би4k
1ъ
ъ2c2
ъ2d
ъj4ma
ъ2k
ъ2l
ъ2n
ъ2p
ъ2t
ъt4ko
ъ2v
ъ2z
ъz3k
ъ2и
3ъиe
ъшe4z
ъ№4ti
ъ2ѕ
щ1b
щ1c
щ1hl
щ3jd
щ4jmovэ
щ1le
щ1my
щ1mм
щ1ra
щr4va
щr4vy
щ1s2
щ2st
щs3te
щs3tбn
щt2
щ3tkl
щ2v
щ3va
щ3vo
щ3vм
щ2z
щ3zo
щ2ѕ
щ3ѕe
щ3ѕi
щ3ѕo
э1b
э3cho
э1d
эd4la
э1h
э1j
э1l
э1ml
э1mм
э2n
э3no
эpo3и4
э1r
э1s2
э2sk
э1t
эt4ku
эt4ky
э1u
э4vli
э3zk
э3zn
э4zvu
эи4nм
э1ш
э№3l
1ѕ
2ѕ.
ѕa3d
ѕa4tv
3ѕaи
2ѕ1b
2ѕ1c
2ѕ1d
ѕe2b3
ѕeh3n
ѕe4ml
ѕe4zg
ѕi4dl
ѕi4jm
3ѕil
ѕi2vl
2ѕk
ѕk4ni
2ѕl
ѕ4lic
3ѕlo
2ѕ1m
2ѕn
ѕon2
2ѕ1s2
2ѕ1t
ѕ2v
ѕб4br
ѕб4nr
2ѕп
ѕн4zn
2ѕт
2ѕ№
ѕ№4ti
ѕ№4tм
